Hawaii statutes.
§339D-12 Federal preemption. (a) Part
II of this chapter shall be deemed repealed if a federal law or a combination
of federal laws takes effect that establishes a national program for the
collection and recycling of covered electronic devices that substantially meets
the intent of part II of this chapter, including the creation of a financing
mechanism for collection, transportation, and recycling of all covered
electronic devices from covered entities in the United States.

(b) [Part IV] of this chapter shall be deemed
repealed if a federal law or a combination of federal laws takes effect that
establishes a national program for the recycling of covered televisions that
substantially meets the intent of [part IV] of this chapter. [L Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 183, §15]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next